Utah statutes.
17B-2a-504.   Irrigation district board of trustees -- Bond for board of trustees members and district if the district is appointed as fiscal or other agent for the United States.

(1) (a)  One board of trustees member shall be elected from each division established as provided in Section 17B-2a-505.

(b)  Each landowner within an irrigation district may vote for one board of trustees member for the division in which the landowner's land is located.

(c)  Each landowner is entitled to cast one vote for each acre-foot or fraction of an acre-foot of water allotted to the land owned by the landowner.

(2) (a)  If an irrigation district is appointed fiscal agent of the United States or is authorized by the United States to collect money on behalf of the United States with respect to a federal project:

(i)  each member of the district's board of trustees shall:

(A)  execute an official bond in the amount required by the Secretary of the Interior, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the trustee's duties; and

(B)  file the official bond in the office of the clerk of the county in which the district is located; and

(ii)  the irrigation district shall execute an additional bond for the district's faithful discharge of its duties as fiscal or other agent of the United States.

(b)  The United States or any person injured by the failure of a member of the board of trustees or of the district to perform fully, promptly, and completely a duty may sue upon the official bond.

